Utah statutes.
70C-2-204.   Certain negotiable instruments prohibited.

With respect to a consumer credit sale not involving real property, the seller may not take a negotiable instrument under Section 70A-3-104 other than a check as evidence of the obligation of the buyer.  A holder is not in good faith under Subsection 70A-1a-201(2)(t) if he takes a negotiable instrument with notice that it is issued in violation of this section.  A holder in due course under Section 70A-3-302 is not subject to the liabilities set forth in the provisions on the effect of violations on rights of parties under Section 70C-7-201.



Amended by Chapter 272, 2007 General Session

